Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2915
Immunity; exceptions.

No mediator, restorative justice facilitator, staff member, or member of a governing board of an approved center may be held liable for civil damages for any statement or decision made in the process of restorative justice or dispute resolution unless such person acted in a manner exhibiting willful or wanton misconduct.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 16.